Utah statutes.
6-1-15.   Debts not matured -- Delay in filing claims.

Any creditor may claim debts to become due as well as debts due, but on debts not due a reasonable rebate shall be made when the same are not drawing interest.  Creditors who do not file their claims within three months from the publication of notice as aforesaid may not participate in dividends until after payment in full of all claims presented within said time and allowed by the court, unless the court has extended the time for filing such claims.

